Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 457 Uniform Power of Attorney Act (2006)
457.310.
Banks and other financial institutions.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to banks and other financial institutions authorizes the agent to:

Continue, modify, and terminate an account or other banking arrangement made by or on behalf of the principal;

Establish, modify, and terminate an account or other banking arrangement with a bank, trust company, savings and loan association, credit union, thrift company, brokerage firm, or other financial institution selected by the agent;

Contract for services available from a financial institution, including renting a safe deposit box or space in a vault;

Withdraw, by check, order, electronic funds transfer, or otherwise, money or property of the principal deposited with or left in the custody of a financial institution;

Receive statements of account, vouchers, notices, and similar documents from a financial institution and act with respect to them;

Enter a safe deposit box or vault and withdraw or add to the contents;

Borrow money and pledge as security personal property of the principal necessary to borrow money or pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed by the principal;

Make, assign, draw, endorse, discount, guarantee, and negotiate promissory notes, checks, drafts, and other negotiable or nonnegotiable paper of the principal or payable to the principal or the principal’s order, transfer money, receive the cash or other proceeds of those transactions, and accept a draft drawn by a person upon the principal and pay it when due;

Receive for the principal and act upon a sight draft, warehouse receipt, or other document of title whether tangible or electronic, or other negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument;

Apply for, receive, and use letters of credit, credit and debit cards, electronic transaction authorizations, and traveler’s checks from a financial institution and give an indemnity or other agreement in connection with letters of credit; and

Consent to an extension of the time of payment with respect to commercial paper or a financial transaction with a financial institution.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 50, effective July 15, 2020.

457.320.
Operation of entity or business.

Subject to the terms of a document or an agreement governing an entity or an entity ownership interest, and unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to operation of an entity or business authorizes the agent to:

Operate, buy, sell, enlarge, reduce, or terminate an ownership interest;

Perform a duty or discharge a liability and exercise in person or by proxy a right, power, privilege, or option that the principal has, may have, or claims to have;

Enforce the terms of an ownership agreement;

Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to litigation to which the principal is a party because of an ownership interest;

Exercise in person or by proxy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise, a right, power, privilege, or option the principal has or claims to have as the holder of stocks and bonds;

Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to litigation to which the principal is a party concerning stocks and bonds;

With respect to an entity or business owned solely by the principal:

Continue, modify, renegotiate, extend, and terminate a contract made by or on behalf of the principal with respect to the entity or business before execution of the power of attorney;

Determine:

The location of its operation;

The nature and extent of its business;

The methods of manufacturing, selling, merchandising, financing, accounting, and advertising employed in its operation;

The amount and types of insurance carried; and

The mode of engaging, compensating, and dealing with its employees and accountants, attorneys, or other advisors;

Change the name or form of organization under which the entity or business is operated and enter into an ownership agreement with other persons to take over all or part of the operation of the entity or business; and

Demand and receive money due or claimed by the principal or on the principal’s behalf in the operation of the entity or business and control and disburse the money in the operation of the entity or business;

Put additional capital into an entity or business in which the principal has an interest;

Join in a plan of reorganization, consolidation, conversion, domestication, or merger of the entity or business;

Sell or liquidate all or part of an entity or business;

Establish the value of an entity or business under a buy-out agreement to which the principal is a party;

Prepare, sign, file, and deliver reports, compilations of information, returns, or other papers with respect to an entity or business and make related payments; and

Pay, compromise, or contest taxes, assessments, fines, or penalties and perform any other act to protect the principal from illegal or unnecessary taxation, assessments, fines, or penalties, with respect to an entity or business, including attempts to recover, in any manner permitted by law, money paid before or after the execution of the power of attorney.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 51, effective July 15, 2020.

457.330.
Insurance and annuities.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to insurance and annuities authorizes the agent to:

Continue, pay the premium or make a contribution on, modify, exchange, rescind, release, or terminate a contract procured by or on behalf of the principal which insures or provides an annuity to either the principal or another person, whether or not the principal is a beneficiary under the contract;

Procure new, different, and additional contracts of insurance and annuities for the principal and the principal’s spouse, children, and other dependents, and select the amount, type of insurance or annuity, and mode of payment;

Pay the premium or make a contribution on, modify, exchange, rescind, release, or terminate a contract of insurance or annuity procured by the agent;

Apply for and receive a loan secured by a contract of insurance or annuity;

Surrender and receive the cash surrender value on a contract of insurance or annuity;

Exercise an election;

Exercise investment powers available under a contract of insurance or annuity;

Change the manner of paying premiums on a contract of insurance or annuity;

Change or convert the type of insurance or annuity with respect to which the principal has or claims to have authority described in this section;

Apply for and procure a benefit or assistance under a statute or regulation to guarantee or pay premiums of a contract of insurance on the life of the principal;

Collect, sell, assign, hypothecate, borrow against, or pledge the interest of the principal in a contract of insurance or annuity;

Elect the form and timing of the payment of proceeds from a contract of insurance or annuity; and

Pay, from proceeds or otherwise, compromise or contest, and apply for refunds in connection with, a tax or assessment levied by a taxing authority with respect to a contract of insurance or annuity or its proceeds or liability accruing by reason of the tax or assessment.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 52, effective July 15, 2020.

457.340.
Estates, trusts, and other beneficial interests.

In this section, “estate, trust, or other beneficial interest” means a trust, probate estate, guardianship, conservatorship, escrow, or custodianship or a fund from which the principal is, may become, or claims to be, entitled to a share or payment.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to estates, trusts, and other beneficial interests authorizes the agent to:

Accept, receive, receipt for, sell, assign, pledge, or exchange a share in or payment from an estate, trust, or other beneficial interest;

Demand or obtain money or another thing of value to which the principal is, may become, or claims to be, entitled by reason of an estate, trust, or other beneficial interest, by litigation or otherwise;

Exercise for the benefit of the principal a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the principal;

Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to litigation to ascertain the meaning, validity, or effect of a deed, will, declaration of trust, or other instrument or transaction affecting the interest of the principal;

Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to litigation to remove, substitute, or surcharge a fiduciary;

Conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything received for an authorized purpose;

Transfer an interest of the principal in real property, stocks and bonds, accounts with financial institutions or securities intermediaries, insurance, annuities, and other property to the trustee of a revocable trust created by the principal as settlor; and

Reject, renounce, disclaim, release, or consent to a reduction in or modification of a share in or payment from an estate, trust, or other beneficial interest.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 53, effective July 15, 2020.

457.350.
Claims and litigation.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to claims and litigation authorizes the agent to:

Assert and maintain before a court or administrative agency a claim, claim for relief, cause of action, counterclaim, offset, recoupment, or defense, including an action to recover property or other thing of value, recover damages sustained by the principal, eliminate or modify tax liability, or seek an injunction, specific performance, or other relief;

Bring an action to determine adverse claims or intervene or otherwise participate in litigation;

Seek an attachment, garnishment, order of arrest, or other preliminary, provisional, or intermediate relief and use an available procedure to effect or satisfy a judgment, order, or decree;

Make or accept a tender, offer of judgment, or admission of facts, submit a controversy on an agreed statement of facts, consent to examination, and bind the principal in litigation;

Submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, and propose or accept a compromise;

Waive the issuance and service of process upon the principal, accept service of process, appear for the principal, designate persons upon which process directed to the principal may be served, execute and file or deliver stipulations on the principal’s behalf, verify pleadings, seek appellate review, procure and give surety and indemnity bonds, contract and pay for the preparation and printing of records and briefs, receive, execute, and file or deliver a consent, waiver, release, confession of judgment, satisfaction of judgment, notice, agreement, or other instrument in connection with the prosecution, settlement, or defense of a claim or litigation;

Act for the principal with respect to bankruptcy or insolvency, whether voluntary or involuntary, concerning the principal or some other person, or with respect to a reorganization, receivership, or application for the appointment of a receiver or trustee which affects an interest of the principal in property or other thing of value;

Pay a judgment, award, or order against the principal or a settlement made in connection with a claim or litigation; and

Receive money or other thing of value paid in settlement of or as proceeds of a claim or litigation.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 54, effective July 15, 2020.

457.360.
Personal and family maintenance.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to personal and family maintenance authorizes the agent to:

Perform the acts necessary to maintain the customary standard of living of the principal, the principal’s spouse, and the following individuals, whether living when the power of attorney is executed or later born:

The principal’s children;

Other individuals legally entitled to be supported by the principal; and

The individuals whom the principal has customarily supported or indicated the intent to support;

Make periodic payments of child support and other family maintenance required by a court or governmental agency or an agreement to which the principal is a party;

Provide living quarters for the individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection by:

Purchase, lease, or other contract; or

Paying the operating costs, including interest, amortization payments, repairs, improvements, and taxes, for premises owned by the principal or occupied by those individuals;

Provide normal domestic help, usual vacations and travel expenses, and funds for shelter, clothing, food, appropriate education, including postsecondary and vocational education, and other current living costs for the individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;

Pay expenses for necessary health care and custodial care on behalf of the individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;

Act as the principal’s personal representative pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, Sections 1171 through 1179 of the Social Security Act, 42

U.S.C. sec. 1320

d, as amended, and applicable regulations, in making decisions related to the past, present, or future payment for the provision of health care consented to by the principal or anyone authorized under the law of this state to consent to health care on behalf of the principal;

Continue any provision made by the principal for automobiles or other means of transportation, including registering, licensing, insuring, and replacing them, for the individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;

Maintain credit and debit accounts for the convenience of the individuals described in paragraph (a) of this subsection and open new accounts; and

Continue payments incidental to the membership or affiliation of the principal in a religious institution, club, society, order, or other organization or to continue contributions to those organizations.

Authority with respect to personal and family maintenance is neither dependent upon, nor limited by, authority that an agent may or may not have with respect to gifts under this chapter.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 55, effective July 15, 2020.

457.370.
Benefits from governmental programs or civil or military service.

In this section, “benefits from governmental programs or civil or military service” means any benefit, program or assistance provided under a statute or regulation including Social Security, Medicare, and Medicaid.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to benefits from governmental programs or civil or military service authorizes the agent to:

Execute vouchers in the name of the principal for allowances and reimbursements payable by the United States or a foreign government or by a state or subdivision of a state to the principal, including allowances and reimbursements for transportation of the individuals described in KRS 457.360(1)(a), and for shipment of their household effects;

Take possession and order the removal and shipment of property of the principal from a post, warehouse, depot, dock, or other place of storage or safekeeping, either governmental or private, and execute and deliver a release, voucher, receipt, bill of lading, shipping ticket, certificate, or other instrument for that purpose;

Enroll in, apply for, select, reject, change, amend, or discontinue, on the principal’s behalf, a benefit or program;

Prepare, file, and maintain a claim of the principal for a benefit or assistance, financial or otherwise, to which the principal may be entitled under a statute or regulation;

Initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to litigation concerning any benefit or assistance the principal may be entitled to receive under a statute or regulation; and

Receive the financial proceeds of a claim described in paragraph (d) of this subsection and conserve, invest, disburse, or use for a lawful purpose anything so received.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 56, effective July 15, 2020.

457.380.
Retirement plans.

In this section, “retirement plan” means a plan or account created by an employer, the principal, or another individual to provide retirement benefits or deferred compensation of which the principal is a participant, beneficiary, or owner, including a plan or account under the following sections of the Internal Revenue Code:

An individual retirement account under Internal Revenue Code Section 408, 26

U.S.C. sec. 408

, as amended;

A Roth individual retirement account under Internal Revenue Code Section 408A, 26

U.S.C. sec. 408

A, as amended;

A deemed individual retirement account under Internal Revenue Code Section 408(q), 26

U.S.C. sec. 408(q)

, as amended;

An annuity or mutual fund custodial account under Internal Revenue Code Section 403(b), 26

U.S.C. sec. 403(b)

, as amended;

A pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or other retirement plan qualified under Internal Revenue Code Section 401(a), 26

U.S.C. sec. 401(a)

, as amended;

A plan under Internal Revenue Code Section 457(b), 26

U.S.C. sec. 457(b)

, as amended; and

A nonqualified deferred compensation plan under Internal Revenue Code Section 409A, 26

U.S.C. sec. 409

A, as amended.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to retirement plans authorizes the agent to:

Select the form and timing of payments under a retirement plan and withdraw benefits from a plan;

Make a rollover, including a direct trustee-to-trustee rollover, of benefits from one (1) retirement plan to another;

Establish a retirement plan in the principal’s name;

Make contributions to a retirement plan;

Exercise investment powers available under a retirement plan; and

Borrow from, sell assets to, or purchase assets from a retirement plan.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 57, effective July 15, 2020.

457.390.
Taxes.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to taxes authorizes the agent to:

Prepare, sign, and file federal, state, local, and foreign income, gift, payroll, property, Federal Insurance Contributions Act, and other tax returns, claims for refunds, requests for extension of time, petitions regarding tax matters, and any other tax-related documents, including receipts, offers, waivers, consents, including consents and agreements under Internal Revenue Code Section 2032A, 26

U.S.C. sec. 2032

A, as amended, closing agreements, and any power of attorney required by the Internal Revenue Service or other taxing authority with respect to a tax year upon which the statute of limitations has not run and the following twenty-five (25) tax years;

Pay taxes due, collect refunds, post bonds, receive confidential information, and contest deficiencies determined by the Internal Revenue Service or other taxing authority;

Exercise any election available to the principal under federal, state, local, or foreign tax law; and

Act for the principal in all tax matters for all periods before the Internal Revenue Service, or other taxing authority.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 58, effective July 15, 2020.

457.400.
Gifts.

In this section, a gift “for the benefit of” a person includes a gift to a trust, an account under the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (1983/1986), and a tuition savings account or prepaid tuition plan as defined under Internal Revenue Code Section 529, 26

U.S.C. sec. 529

, as amended.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to gifts authorizes the agent only to:

Make outright to, or for the benefit of, a person, a gift of any of the principal’s property, including by the exercise of a presently exercisable general power of appointment held by the principal, in an amount per donee not to exceed the annual dollar limits of the federal gift tax exclusion under Internal Revenue Code Section 2503(b), 26

U.S.C. sec. 2503(b)

, as amended, without regard to whether the federal gift tax exclusion applies to the gift, or if the principal’s spouse agrees to consent to a split gift pursuant to Internal Revenue Code Section 2513, 26

U.S.C. sec. 2513

, as amended, in an amount per donee not to exceed twice the annual federal gift tax exclusion limit; and

Consent, pursuant to Internal Revenue Code Section 2513, 26

U.S.C. sec. 2513

, as amended, to the splitting of a gift made by the principal’s spouse in an amount per donee not to exceed the aggregate annual gift tax exclusions for both spouses.

An agent may make a gift of the principal’s property only as the agent determines is consistent with the principal’s objectives if actually known by the agent and, if unknown, as the agent determines is consistent with the principal’s best interest based on all relevant factors, including:

The value and nature of the principal’s property;

The principal’s foreseeable obligations and need for maintenance;

Minimization of taxes, including income, estate, inheritance, generation-skipping transfer, and gift taxes;

Eligibility for a benefit, a program, or assistance under a statute or regulation; and

The principal’s personal history of making or joining in making gifts.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 59, effective July 15, 2020.

457.410.
Construction.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize an agent appointed pursuant to a power of attorney to act or make decisions on behalf of the principal which are not related to the principal’s property or finances.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 60, effective July 15, 2020.

457.420.
Statutory form power of attorney.

A document substantially in the following form may be used to create a statutory form power of attorney that has the meaning and effect prescribed by this chapter:

KENTUCKY STATUTORY FORM POWER OF ATTORNEY IMPORTANT INFORMATION

Click to view

This power of attorney authorizes another person (your agent) to make decisions concerning your property for you (the principal). Your agent will be able to make decisions and act with respect to your property (including your money) whether or not you are able to act for yourself. The meaning of authority over subjects listed on this form is explained in the Uniform Power of Attorney Act in KRS Chapter 457.

This power of attorney does not authorize the agent to make health-care decisions for you.

You should select someone you trust to serve as your agent. Unless you specify otherwise, generally the agent’s authority will continue until you die or revoke the power of attorney or the agent resigns or is unable to act for you.

Your agent is entitled to reasonable compensation unless you state otherwise in the Special Instructions.

This form provides for designation of one (1) agent. If you wish to name more than one (1) agent you may name a coagent in the Special Instructions. Coagents are not required to act together unless you include that requirement in the Special Instructions.

If your agent is unable or unwilling to act for you, your power of attorney will end unless you have named a successor agent. You may also name a second successor agent.

This power of attorney becomes effective immediately unless you state otherwise in the Special Instructions.

If you have questions about the power of attorney or the authority you are granting to your agent, you should seek legal advice before signing this form.

DESIGNATION OF AGENT I, , name the following person as my agent: (Name of Principal) Name of Agent: Agent’s Address: Agent’s Telephone Number: DESIGNATION OF SUCCESSOR AGENT(S) (OPTIONAL) If my successor agent is unwilling or unable to act for me, I name as my second successor agent: Name of Second Successor Agent: Second Successor Agent’s Address: Second Successor Agent’s Telephone Number: If my successor agent is unwilling or unable to act for me, I name as my second successor agent: Name of Second Successor Agent: Second Successor Agent’s Address: Second Successor Agent’s Telephone Number:

Click to view

GRANT OF GENERAL AUTHORITY

Click to view

I grant my agent and any successor agent general authority to act for me with respect to the following subjects as defined in the Uniform Power of Attorney Act in KRS Chapter 457:

(INITIAL each subject you want to include in the agent’s general authority. If you wish to grant general authority over all of the subjects you may initial “All Preceding Subjects” instead of initialing each subject.) (___) Real Property (___) Tangible Personal Property (___) Stocks and Bonds (___) Commodities and Options (___) Banks and Other Financial Institutions (___) Operation of Entity or Business (___) Insurance and Annuities (___) Estates, Trusts, and Other Beneficial Interests (___) Claims and Litigation (___) Personal and Family Maintenance (___) Benefits from Governmental Programs or Civil or Military Service (___) Retirement Plans (___) Taxes (___) All Preceding Subjects

Click to view

GRANT OF SPECIFIC AUTHORITY (OPTIONAL)

Click to view

My agent MAY NOT do any of the following specific acts for me UNLESS I have INITIALED the specific authority listed below:

(CAUTION: Granting any of the following will give your agent the authority to take actions that could significantly reduce your property or change how your property is distributed at your death. INITIAL ONLY the specific authority you WANT to give your agent.) (___) Create, amend, revoke, or terminate an inter vivos trust (___) Make a gift, subject to the limitations of the Uniform Power of Attorney Act in and any special instructions in this power of attorney KRS

457.400

(___) Create or change rights of survivorship (___) Create or change a beneficiary designation (___) Authorize another person to exercise the authority granted under this power of attorney (___) Waive the principal’s right to be a beneficiary of a joint and survivor annuity, including a survivor benefit under a retirement plan (___) Exercise fiduciary powers that the principal has authority to delegate (___) Access the content of electronic communications

Click to view

LIMITATION ON AGENT’S AUTHORITY

Click to view

An agent that is not my ancestor, spouse, or descendant MAY NOT use my property to benefit the agent or a person to whom the agent owes an obligation of support unless I have included that authority in the Special Instructions.

SPECIAL INSTRUCTIONS (OPTIONAL)

Click to view

You may give special instructions on the following lines:

_________

_________

_________

_________

_________

_________

_________

_________

EFFECTIVE DATE

Click to view

This power of attorney is effective immediately unless I have stated otherwise in the Special Instructions.

NOMINATION OF CONSERVATOR OR GUARDIAN (OPTIONAL)

Click to view

If it becomes necessary for a court to appoint a conservator of my estate or guardian of my person, I nominate the following person(s) for appointment:

Name of Nominee for conservator of my estate: Nominee’s Address: Nominee’s Telephone Number: Name of Nominee for guardian of my person: Nominee’s Address: Nominee’s Telephone Number:

Click to view

RELIANCE ON THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY

Click to view

Any person, including my agent, may rely upon the validity of this power of attorney or a copy of it unless that person knows it has terminated or is invalid.

SIGNATURE AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT

Click to view

Your Signature Date Your Name Printed Your Address Your Telephone Number State of County of This document was acknowledged before me on (Date) by (Name of Principal) Signature of Notary (Seal, if any) My commission expires: This document prepared by:

Click to view

IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR AGENT

Click to view

Agent’s Duties

When you accept the authority granted under this power of attorney, a special legal relationship is created between you and the principal. This relationship imposes upon you legal duties that continue until you resign or the power of attorney is terminated or revoked. You must:

Do what you know the principal reasonably expects you to do with the principal’s property or, if you do not know the principal’s expectations, act in the principal’s best interest;

Act in good faith;

Do nothing beyond the authority granted in this power of attorney; and

Disclose your identity as an agent whenever you act for the principal by writing or printing the name of the principal and signing your own name as “agent” in the following manner:

Unless the Special Instructions in this power of attorney state otherwise, you must also:

(Principal’s Name) by (Your Signature) as Agent

Click to view

Act loyally for the principal’s benefit;

Avoid conflicts that would impair your ability to act in the principal’s best interest;

Act with care, competence, and diligence;

Keep a record of all receipts, disbursements, and transactions made on behalf of the principal;

Cooperate with any person that has authority to make health-care decisions for the principal to do what you know the principal reasonably expects or, if you do not know the principal’s expectations, to act in the principal’s best interest; and

Attempt to preserve the principal’s estate plan if you know the plan and preserving the plan is consistent with the principal’s best interest.

You must stop acting on behalf of the principal if you learn of any event that terminates this power of attorney or your authority under this power of attorney. Events that terminate a power of attorney or your authority to act under a power of attorney include:

TERMINATION OF AGENT'S AUTHORITY

Click to view

Death of the principal;

The principal’s revocation of the power of attorney or your authority;

The occurrence of a termination event stated in the power of attorney;

The purpose of the power of attorney is fully accomplished; or

If you are married to the principal, a legal action is filed with a court to end your marriage, or for your legal separation, unless the Special Instructions in this power of attorney state that such an action will not terminate your authority.

LIABILITY OF AGENT

Click to view

The meaning of the authority granted to you is defined in the Uniform Power of Attorney Act in KRS Chapter 457. If you violate the Uniform Power of Attorney Act under KRS Chapter 457 or act outside the authority granted, you may be liable for any damages caused by your violation.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 61, effective July 15, 2020.

457.430.
Agent’s certification.

The following optional form may be used by an agent to certify facts concerning a power of attorney:

AGENT’S CERTIFICATION AS TO THE VALIDITY OF POWER OF ATTORNEY AND AGENT’S AUTHORITY State of County of I, (Name of Agent), certify under penalty of perjury that (Name of Principal) granted me authority as an agent or successor agent in a power of attorney dated .

Click to view

I further certify that to my knowledge:

The Principal is alive and has not revoked the Power of Attorney or my authority to act under the Power of Attorney and the Power of Attorney and my authority to act under the Power of Attorney have not terminated;

If the Power of Attorney was drafted to become effective upon the happening of an event or contingency, the event or contingency has occurred;

If I was named as a successor agent, the prior agent is no longer able or willing to serve; and

(Insert other relevant statements)

Click to view

SIGNATURE AND ACKNOWLEDGMENT Agent’s Signature Date Agent’s Name Printed Agent’s Address Agent’s Telephone Number This document was acknowledged before me on (Date) by (Name of Agent) (Seal, if any) Signature of Notary My commission expires: This document prepared by:

Click to view

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 41, § 62, effective July 15, 2020.

457.440.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

HISTORY:

Renumbered from §

457.240

, by 2020 ch. 41, § 63, effective July 15, 2020.

457.450.
Relation to federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. secs. 7001

et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001(c)

, or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7003(b)

.

HISTORY:

Renumbered from §

457.250

, by 2020 ch. 41, § 64, effective July 15, 2020.

457.460.
Effect on existing powers of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on July 15, 2020:

This chapter applies to a power of attorney created before, on, or after July 15, 2020;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after July 15, 2020;

This chapter applies to a judicial proceeding concerning a power of attorney commenced before July 15, 2020, unless the court finds that application of a provision of this chapter would substantially interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice the rights of a party, in which case that provision does not apply and the superseded law applies; and

An act done before July 15, 2020, is not affected by this chapter.

HISTORY:

Renumbered from §

457.260

, by 2020 ch. 41, § 65, effective July 15, 2020.